District of Columbia statutes.
49-905

Annual estimates.

The Commanding General shall annually transmit to the Mayor of the District of Columbia an estimate of the amount of money required for the next ensuing fiscal year to pay the expenses authorized by this title, and the said Mayor shall include the same in his annual estimates of appropriations for the District; and all moneys appropriated to pay the expenses authorized by this title shall be disbursed in accordance with law.

History

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 781, ch. 328
as added Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 636, ch. 146, § 66

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 39-705.
1973 Ed., § 39-805.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.